Alaska, session 34, SB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 29.10.200 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 05 (68) AS 29.35.128 (fee waiver for disabled veterans). 06 * Sec. 2. AS 29.35 is amended by adding a new section to read: 07 Sec. 29.35.128. Fee waiver for disabled veterans. (a) A municipality shall 08 waive a building fee, permit fee, plan review fee, plan examination fee, inspection or 09 reinspection fee, or other fee normally required by the municipality for modifications 10 to the residence of a disabled veteran, if the modifications are required to 11 accommodate the veteran's disability. The disabled veteran or disabled veteran's 12 caretaker shall provide proof of the disabled veteran's veteran status and attest that the 13 modifications to the residence are required to accommodate the veteran's disability. 14 The municipality shall determine what constitutes adequate proof of veteran status 01 under this section. In this section, "disabled veteran" means an individual who has 02 served in the armed forces of the United States, the National Guard, or a reserve unit 03 of the United States armed services, and who has a physical or mental impairment that 04 substantially limits one or more major life activities, has a record of having such an 05 impairment, or is regarded as having such an impairment. 06 (b) This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities. 07 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.